Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF847.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; COMMUNITY ACTION GRANTS ONGOING FUNDING.new text end new text begin $2,700,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,700,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of children, youth, and families for community action grants under Minnesota Statutes, sections 142F.30 to 142F.302. new text end